District of Columbia statutes.
47-3716

Final account.

No final account in any probate proceeding of a personal representative who is required to file a federal estate tax return shall be approved by the court unless the court finds that the tax imposed on the property by this chapter, including applicable interest, has been paid in full or that no tax is due.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-168, § 17, 33 DCR 7008
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3716.